Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:(1) Any plan 3 member who joined plan 3 between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2007, and as a result was never offered the opportunity to choose between plan 2 and plan 3, may make an irrevocable choice to transfer to plan 2 during any January after the effective date of this section for purposes of future service, provided that the member earns service credit for that month.(2) The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to transfer under this section.(3) Anyone previously retired from plan 3 is prohibited from transferring to plan 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:(1) Any plan 3 member who joined plan 3 between September 1, 2000, and June 30, 2007, and as a result was never offered the opportunity to choose between plan 2 and plan 3, may make an irrevocable choice during any January after the effective date of this section to transfer to plan 3 for purposes of future service.(2) The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to transfer under this section.(3) Anyone previously retired from plan 3 is prohibited from transferring to plan 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. In the event that the state receives a determination letter or other formal guidance from the federal internal revenue service that the options provided in this act conflict with federal law, the choice to transfer from plan 3 to plan 2 under sections 2 and 3 of this act is suspended until subsequent federal internal revenue service guidance is received that any conflict with federal law has been resolved.--- END ---